Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin INCOME TAX HOLIDAY; POLICE OFFICERS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and before January 1, 2027, an individual who is an eligible police officer may elect to receive an exemption from the individual income tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 290. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible police officer who is eligible for a refundable credit in excess of the individual's liability for tax may still file and claim a return for a taxable year covered by this section. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this section, "eligible police officer" means an individual who: new text end new text begin (1) worked at least 1,000 hours in Minnesota during the taxable year as a peace officer, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); and new text end new text begin (2) had adjusted gross income during the taxable year that did not exceed $75,000, or $150,000 for a married taxpayer filing a joint return. new text end new text begin (d) The definitions in Minnesota Statutes, section 290.01, apply for this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and before January 1, 2027. new text end